Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 6. Variances

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
172.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 35-11-601.
Applications; authority to grant; hearing; limitations; renewals; judicial review; emergencies.

Any person who owns or is in control of any real or personal property, any plant, building, structure, process or equipment may apply to the administrator of the appropriate division for a variance from any rule, regulation, standard or permit promulgated under this act. A variance may be granted upon notice and hearing. The administrator shall give public notice of the request for a variance in the county in which such real or personal property, plant, building, structure, process or equipment is in existence for which the variance is sought. The notice shall designate who has applied for the variance and the nature of the variance requested and the time and place of hearing and shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in said county once a week for four (4) consecutive weeks prior to the date of the hearing. The cost of publication shall be paid by the person applying for the variance. The administrator of the division shall promptly investigate the request, consider the views of the persons who may be affected by the grant of the variance, and all facts bearing on the request, and make a decision with the approval of the director within sixty (60) days from the date the hearing for a variance is held.

If the variance is granted on the ground that there is no practicable means known or available for the adequate prevention, abatement or control of the pollution, or mining operation involved, it shall continue in effect only until the necessary means for prevention, abatement or control become known and available, and subject to the taking of any substitute or alternate measures that the director may prescribe.

If the variance is granted on the ground that compliance with the particular requirement or requirements from which variance is sought will necessitate the taking of measures which, because of their extent or cost, must be spread over a considerable period of time, it shall be for a period not to exceed such reasonable time as, in the view of the director is requisite for the taking of the necessary measures. A variance granted on the ground specified herein shall contain a timetable for the taking of action in an expeditious manner and shall be conditioned on adherence to such timetable.

A variance may be granted by the council from standards established by the council for sulfur oxide emissions, if the council determines that the state of the technology for removal of sulfur oxides from the stack gasses is insufficiently advanced to achieve the objective level without causing undue economic hardship on the owner of the facility or the consumer of the product produced by the facility or if the council determines that the developing technology offers promise that superior equipment might, in the near future, be available which would render presently available equipment obsolete and that the best interests of the state would be served by the issuance of the variance. In considering such a variance, the council must consider the health and well being of the citizens in the vicinity of the facility and the effect upon livestock and agricultural production in the area. In no event shall the variance permit emissions less stringent than existing federal standards covering the emission of sulfur oxides. Each application for a variance will be issued on a case by case basis considering the state of the technology at the time of each application.

If the variance is granted on the ground that it is justified to relieve or prevent hardship of a kind other than that provided for in subsections (b), (c) and (d) of this section, it shall be for not more than one (1) year.

Any variance granted pursuant to this section may be renewed on terms and conditions and for periods which would be appropriate on initial granting of a variance. If complaint by an aggrieved party is made to the director on account of the variance, no renewal thereof shall be granted, unless following public hearing on the complaint on due notice, the council finds that renewal is justified. No renewal shall be granted except on application therefor. Any such application shall be made at least sixty (60) days prior to the expiration of the variance.

Any variance or renewal thereof granted by the director pursuant to this section shall become final unless within thirty (30) days after date of notice as provided in subsection (a) of this section an aggrieved party as defined by this act in writing may request a hearing before the council. Upon the filing of such a request for a hearing, the variance shall be stayed pending the council’s final determination thereon.

If, after a hearing held pursuant to this section, the council finds that a variance is required, it shall affirm or modify the order previously issued by the director or issue an appropriate order for variance as it deems necessary. If, after a hearing held pursuant to this section, the council finds that there is no need for a variance, it shall rescind the issuance of a variance.

In connection with any hearing held pursuant to this section, the council has the power and upon application by any aggrieved party, it has the duty to compel the attendance of witnesses, and the production of evidence on behalf of all parties.

Any aggrieved party adversely affected by a variance or renewal of same or the denial of same may obtain judicial review thereof in the manner prescribed by the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [§§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

].

Failure to comply with the conditions imposed by any variance shall be cause for modification or termination of the variance by the director.

Nothing in this section and no variance or renewal granted pursuant hereto shall be construed to prevent or limit the application of the emergency provisions and procedures of W.S.

35-11-115

to any person or property.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit an application for a water variance. The application for water permits must be made solely under the provisions of W.S.

35-11-302

.

Nothing in this act or regulations under this act shall be construed to permit an application for a variance which would result in less stringent land use or environmental controls or regulations of surface coal mining and reclamation operations than authorized by P.L. 95-87, as that law is worded on August 3, 1977, or the federal regulations promulgated pursuant thereto.

In order to encourage advances in mining and reclamation practices or to allow post-mining land use for industrial, commercial, residential or public use (including recreational facilities), the director, with approval by the secretary of the interior, may authorize departures in individual cases on an experimental basis from the environmental protection performance standards promulgated by the council under this act. Such departures may be authorized if:

The experimental practices are potentially more or at least as environmentally protective, during and after mining operations, as those required by promulgated standards;

The mining operations approved for particular land-use or other purposes are not larger or more numerous than necessary to determine the effectiveness and economic feasibility of the experimental practices; and

The experimental practices do not reduce the protection afforded public health and safety below that provided by promulgated standards.

The secretary of interior, acting through the office of surface mining reclamation and enforcement, shall assist the state in the development of a state program for surface coal mining and reclamation operations which meet the requirements of this act and P.L. 95-87, and at the same time, reflect local requirements and local environmental and agricultural conditions.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.45; Laws 1975, ch. 198, § 2; 1980, ch. 64, § 2; 1992, ch. 60, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Federal reference. —

P.L. 95-87, referred to in subsections (p) and (r), appears mainly as 30 U.S.C. § 1201 et seq.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

All permits under this chapter allow variances, with exception of water quality permits.

United States Steel Corp. v. Wyoming Envtl. Quality Council, 575 P.2d 749,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1978).

Basic reason for this distinction

is that it is required to bring the state provisions into compliance with the federal regulations, which only provide for “schedules of compliance” — not variances. United States Steel Corp. v. Wyoming Envtl. Quality Council, 575 P.2d 749,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1978).

Prohibition of water variances not unconstitutional. —

A prohibition of water variances does not violate art. 1, § 7, Wyo. Const., in that it is an exercise of absolute and arbitrary power; does not deny due process by denying a fair opportunity to challenge applicable water quality standards; and does not deny equal protection of the laws by discriminating between water and other pollutant dischargers. United States Steel Corp. v. Wyoming Envtl. Quality Council, 575 P.2d 749,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1978).

Given various means by which a corporation could present its views as to a water turbidity standard, including opportunity to participate in the promulgation process and to assure that there was procedural compliance, opportunity to obtain judicial review, if it was affected in fact by the rule adopted, and opportunity to seek the amendment or repeal of the rule, the corporation's rights to procedural due process were not infringed by the prohibition of water variances under subsection (o) of this section. United States Steel Corp. v. Wyoming Envtl. Quality Council, 575 P.2d 749,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1978).

There are rational reasons to distinguish between water and other pollutant dischargers, including: the different nature of the natural resources; the difference in the number of pollutant dischargers within each class; and the difference in the extent of damage which can result from the various discharges. United States Steel Corp. v. Wyoming Envtl. Quality Council, 575 P.2d 749,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1978).

Cited

in

Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction and application of variance provisions in state and local air pollution control laws and regulations, 66 ALR4th 711.